Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB590.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "covered device" and "manufacturer" in section 102 of the act of November 23, 2010 (P.L.1083, No.108), known as the Covered Device Recycling Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Covered device." A covered computer device [and], covered 12345678910111213141516171819202122 television device and photovoltaic module marketed and intended for use by a consumer. The term does not include:(1) a device that is a part of a motor vehicle or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle;(2) a device that is functionally or physically a part of or connected to or integrated within equipment or a system designed and intended for use in an industrial, governmental, commercial, research and development or medical setting, including, but not limited to, diagnostic, monitoring, control or medical products as defined under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), or equipment used for security, sensing, monitoring, antiterrorism, emergency services purposes or equipment designed and intended primarily for use by professional users;(3) a device that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, air purifier or exercise equipment; or(4) any of the following:(i) Telephone of any type, including a mobile phone.(ii) Personal digital assistant.(iii) Global positioning system.* * *"Manufacturer." A computer manufacturer [or], a television manufacturer or a photovoltaic module manufacturer.* * *20250SB0590PN0597 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Photovoltaic module." The smallest nondivisible, environmentally protected assembly of photovoltaic cells or other photovoltaic collector technology and ancillary parts intended to generate electrical power under sunlight. The term does not include a photovoltaic cell that is part of a consumer electronic device for which the photovoltaic cell provides electricity needed to make the consumer electronic device function. The term includes an interconnection, terminal and protective device such as a diode that is:(1) installed on, connected to or integral with a building; or(2) used as a component of a freestanding, off-grid, power generation system, including a powered water pumping station, electric vehicle charging station, fencing, street and signage light, or used for a commercial or agricultural purpose."Photovoltaic module manufacturer." A person that:(1) manufactures photovoltaic modules to be sold under its own brand as identified by its own brand label;(2) sells photovoltaic modules manufactured by others under its own brand as identified by its own brand label; or(3) assumes the duties imposed on a manufacturer or retailer under this act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0590PN0597 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425